apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="ад__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ов</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="мэ/р__n_m_an">
      <e><p><l>р</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ра</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ра</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ру</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ром</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ре</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ры</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ров</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ров</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>рам</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>рами</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>рах</l><r>р<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="д/но__n_nt_nn">
      <e><p><l>но</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>но</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>на</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ну</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ном</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>не</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>онья</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>онья</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оньев</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оньям</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оньями</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>оньях</l><r>но<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="звани/е__n_nt_nn">
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ем</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>й</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ям</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ями</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ях</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="животно/е__n_nt_aa">
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ем</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>й</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ям</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ями</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ях</l><r>е<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  
    <pardef n="волос__n_m_nn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>а</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>у</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ом</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>е</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ы</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ам</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ами</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ах</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="prp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  

    <e lm="ад"><i>ад</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="аэропорт"><i>аэропорт</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="бомбардирование"><i>бомбардировани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="бэр"><i>бэр</i><par n="волос__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="вал"><i>вал</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ватт"><i>ватт</i><par n="волос__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="вес"><i>вес</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="видение"><i>видени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="вице-мэр"><i>вице-мэ</i><par n="мэ/р__n_m_an"/></e>
    <e lm="воздействие"><i>воздействи</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="волос"><i>волос</i><par n="волос__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="воскресение"><i>воскресени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="втягивание"><i>втягивани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="высказывание"><i>высказывани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="грамм"><i>грамм</i><par n="волос__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="деяние"><i>деяни</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="дно"><i>д</i><par n="д/но__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="желание"><i>желани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="животное" a="slasher"><i>животно</i><par n="животно/е__n_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="закрепление"><i>закреплени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="заседание"><i>заседани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="значение"><i>значени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="изменение"><i>изменени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="искривление"><i>искривлени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="карат"><i>карат</i><par n="волос__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="колядование"><i>колядовани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="манипулирование"><i>манипулировани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="мир"><i>мир</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="мэр"><i>мэ</i><par n="мэ/р__n_m_an"/></e>
    <e lm="награждение"><i>награждени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="наполнение"><i>наполнени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="настаивание"><i>настаивани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="незнание"><i>незнани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="нововведение"><i>нововведени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="обозначение"><i>обозначени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="объятие"><i>объяти</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="описание"><i>описани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="осложнение"><i>осложнени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="открывание"><i>открывани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="отстранение"><i>отстранени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="передвигание"><i>передвигани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="переформатирование"><i>переформатировани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="погружение"><i>погружени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="показание"><i>показани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="помидор"><i>помидор</i><par n="волос__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="поношение"><i>поношени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="порт"><i>порт</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="поступление"><i>поступлени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="предостережение"><i>предостережени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="преодоление"><i>преодолени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="призвание"><i>призвани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="присуждение"><i>присуждени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="происшествие"><i>происшестви</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="прощание"><i>прощани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="раздражение"><i>раздражени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="ранение"><i>ранени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="рассуждение"><i>рассуждени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="рельс"><i>рельс</i><par n="волос__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="самоопределение"><i>самоопределени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="свыкание"><i>свыкани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="склад"><i>склад</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="снижение"><i>снижени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="соединение"><i>соединени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сосредоточение"><i>сосредоточени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сращение"><i>сращени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сужение"><i>сужени</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="сэр"><i>сэ</i><par n="мэ/р__n_m_an"/></e>
    <e lm="транспортирование"><i>транспортировани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="удержание"><i>удержани</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="условие"><i>услови</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="цвет"><i>цвет</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="шкаф"><i>шкаф</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
<e lm="горицвет"><i>горицвет</i><par n="ад__n_m_nn"/></e>
<e lm="локон"><i>локон</i><par n="волос__n_m_nn"/></e>
<e lm="покрытие"><i>покрыти</i><par n="звани/е__n_nt_nn"/></e>
